Utah statutes.
70A-9a-327.   Priority of security interests in deposit account.

The following rules govern priority among conflicting security interests in the same deposit account:

(1)  A security interest held by a secured party having control of the deposit account under Section 70A-9a-104 has priority over a conflicting security interest held by a secured party that does not have control.

(2)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsections (3) and (4), security interests perfected by control under Section 70A-9a-314 rank according to priority in time of obtaining control.

(3)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (4), a security interest held by the bank with which the deposit account is maintained has priority over a conflicting security interest held by another secured party.

(4)  A security interest perfected by control under Subsection 70A-9a-104(1)(c) has priority over a security interest held by the bank with which the deposit account is maintained.

